tests/commonwords.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../ton.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ton.automorf.hfst
Tests:
  Unknown words:
    e<adj><def>: e
    he<adj><sdef>: he
    ʻae<unk>: ʻae
    naʻe<unk>: naʻe
    pea<n><sg>: pea
    ʻi<unk>: ʻi
    Pea<unk>: Pea
    ʻOtua<unk>: ʻOtua
    ko<unk>: ko
    ʻe<unk>: ʻe
    ki<unk>: ki
    hono<unk>: hono
    ʻoku<unk>: ʻoku
    ngaahi<cl><pl>: ngaahi
    ʻoe<unk>: ʻoe
    ki<unk>: ki
    ʻo<unk>: ʻo
    kotoa<unk>: kotoa
    kuo<unk>: kuo
    meʻa<unk>: meʻa
    ai<unk>: ai
